Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVII Special Proceedings
Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky (1976)

416.540.
Definitions for KRS 416.540 to 416.670.

As used in KRS

416.540

to

416.670

:

“Condemn” means to take private property for a public use under the right of eminent domain;

“Condemnor” shall mean and include any person, corporation or entity, including the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies and departments, county, municipality and taxing district authorized and empowered by law to exercise the right of eminent domain;

“Condemnee” means the owner of the property interest being taken;

“Court” means the Circuit Court;

“Eminent domain” means the right of the Commonwealth to take for public use and shall include the right of private persons, corporations, or business entities to do so under authority of law;

“Government lien” means any lien established by or in favor of the Commonwealth or a local government under KRS Chapter 65, 82, 91, 91A, or 134;

“Local government” means any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county; and

“Property” means real or personal property, or both, of any nature or kind that is subject to condemnation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 2; 2006, ch. 73, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 127, § 9, effective July 15, 2016.

416.550.
Right
to condemn.

Whenever any condemnor cannot,
by agreement with the owner thereof, acquire the property right, privileges
or easements needed for any of the uses or purposes for which the condemnor
is authorized by law, to exercise its right of eminent domain, the condemnor
may condemn such property, property rights, privileges or easements pursuant
to the provisions of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

. It is not a prerequisite to an
action to attempt to agree with an owner who is unknown or who, after reasonable
effort, cannot be found within the state or with an owner who is under a disability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 3.

416.560.
Initiation
of condemnation proceedings — Costs — Right of entry — Damages.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, a department, instrumentality or agency of a consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county government, other than a waterworks corporation the capital stock of which is wholly owned by a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, having a right of eminent domain under other statutes shall exercise such right only by requesting the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county to institute condemnation proceedings on its behalf. If the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county agrees, it shall institute such proceedings under KRS

416.570

, and all costs involved in the condemnation shall be borne by the department, instrumentality, or agency requesting the condemnation.

If any department, instrumentality, or agency of a consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county government, other than a waterworks corporation the capital stock of which is wholly owned by a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, operates in more than one (1) governmental unit, it shall request the governing body of the consolidated local government, city, county, or urban-county government wherein the largest part of the individual tract of the property sought to be condemned lies, to institute condemnation proceedings on its behalf.

A department, instrumentality, or agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, other than the Transportation Cabinet and local boards of education, having a right of eminent domain under other statutes shall exercise such right only by requesting the Finance and Administration Cabinet to institute condemnation proceedings on its behalf. If the Finance and Administration Cabinet agrees, it shall institute such proceedings under KRS

416.570

, and all costs involved in the condemnation shall be borne by the department, instrumentality, or agency requesting the condemnation.

Prior to the filing of the petition to condemn, the condemnor or its employees or agents shall have the right to enter upon any land or improvement which it has the power to condemn, in order to make studies, surveys, tests, sounding, and appraisals, provided that the owner of the land or the party in whose name the property is assessed has been notified ten (10) days prior to entry on the property. Any actual damages sustained by the owner of a property interest in the property entered upon by the condemnor shall be paid by the condemnor and shall be assessed by the court or the court may refer the matter to commissioners to ascertain and assess the damages sustained by the condemnee, which award shall be subject to appeal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 4; 1982, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 230, effective July 15, 2002.

416.570.
Filing
of petition.

Except as otherwise provided
in KRS

416.560

, a condemnor seeking to condemn property or the use and occupation
thereof, shall file a verified petition in the Circuit Court of the county
in which all or the greater portion of the property sought to be condemned
is located, which petition shall state that it is filed under the provisions
of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

and shall contain, in substance:

Allegations sufficient to show that the petitioner is entitled, under the provisions of applicable law, to exercise the right of eminent domain and to condemn the property, or the use and occupation thereof, sought to be taken in such proceedings;

A particular description of the property and the use and occupation thereof sought to be condemned; and

An application to the court to appoint commissioners to award the amount of compensation the owner of the property sought to be condemned is entitled to receive therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 5.

416.580.
Commissioners — Appointment — Report — Compensation — Vacancy — Majority required — Eminent domain proceedings.

The Circuit Court, or in the absence of the Circuit Judge from the county, the Circuit Court Clerk, shall appoint as commissioners three (3) impartial housekeepers of the county who are owners of land. They shall be sworn to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties under this section. The commissioners shall view the land or material sought to be condemned and award to the owner or owners such a sum as will fairly represent the reduction in the market value of the entire property, all of or a portion of which is sought to be condemned, said sum being the difference between the market value of the entire property immediately before the taking and the market value of the remainder of the property immediately after the taking thereof, together with the fair rental value of any temporary easements sought to be condemned. Within fifteen (15) days from the date of their appointment they shall return a written report to the office of the Circuit Court, stating the above values in their award and shall describe in their report the property sought to be condemned. They shall be allowed a reasonable fee which shall be taxed as costs.

If any person appointed to serve as commissioner fails, refuses or becomes incapable of acting, the court, or judge thereof shall forthwith appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. A majority of the commissioners appointed and qualified have the power to act and to make and sign the award and report. If a majority of the commissioners do not agree on a decision, three (3) new commissioners shall be appointed by the court on application by any of the parties to the action.

In eminent domain proceedings instituted pursuant to KRS

99.700

to

99.730

, in determining the market of value blighted or deteriorated property, the commissioners shall consider:

The estimated cost of repairs necessary to bring the property up to the minimum standards of the local housing or nuisance code as determined by an independent appraiser, general building or residential contractor or inspector; or

The cost of demolition of the property, if the commissioners determine that demolition would be the most cost-effective manner of addressing the blighted or deteriorated structures on the property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 6; 2016 ch. 127, § 10, effective July 15, 2016.

416.590.
Issuing
summons.

Upon the application of the
petitioner, and the filing of any necessary affidavits, the clerk of the court
shall issue process against the owner to show cause why the petitioner does
not have the right to condemn the lands, or the use and occupation thereof
sought to be condemned. The summons shall contain a statement of the amount
of the award and shall state that an answer or other pleading, if any, must
be filed within twenty (20) days from date of service. The clerk shall make
such orders as to nonresidents and persons under disability as are required
by the statutes and Rules of Civil Procedure in actions against them in Circuit
Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 7.

416.600.
Filing
answer.

Any answer or other pleading
filed by the owner in response to the summons shall be filed on or before
the twenty (20) days after date of service and shall be confined solely to
the question of the right of the petitioner to condemn the property sought
to be condemned, but without prejudice to the owner’s right to except from
the amount of the compensation awarded in the manner provided in KRS

416.550

to

416.670

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 8.

416.610.
Trial
by court on pleadings — Interlocutory judgment.

After the owner has been summoned twenty (20) days, the court shall examine the report of the commissioners to determine whether it conforms to the provisions of KRS

416.580

. If the report of the commissioners is not in the proper form the court shall require the commissioners to make such corrections as are necessary.

If no answer or other pleading is filed by the owner or owners putting in issue the right of the petitioner to condemn the property or the use and occupation thereof sought to be condemned, the court shall enter an interlocutory judgment which shall contain, in substance:

A finding that the petitioner has the right, under the provisions of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

and other applicable law to condemn the property or the use and occupation thereof;

A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to the provisions of KRS

416.580

;

An authorization to take possession of the property for the purposes and under the conditions and limitations, if any, set forth in the petition upon payment to the owner or to the clerk of the court the amount of the compensation awarded by the commissioners;

Proper provision for the conveyance of the title to the land and material, to the extent condemned, as adjudged therein in the event no exception is taken as provided in KRS 416.620(1).

Any exception from such interlocutory judgment by either party or both parties shall be confined solely to exceptions to the amount of compensation awarded by the commissioners.

If the owner has filed answer or pleading putting in issue the right of the petitioner to condemn the property or use and occupation thereof sought to be condemned, the court shall, without intervention of jury, proceed forthwith to hear and determine whether or not the petitioner has such right. If the court determines that petitioner has such rights, an interlocutory judgment, as provided for in subsection (2) of this section, shall be entered. If the court determines that petitioner does not have such right, it shall enter a final judgment which shall contain, in substance:

A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to the provisions of KRS

416.580

;

A finding that the petitioner is not authorized to condemn the property or the use and occupation thereof for the purposes and under the conditions and limitations set forth in the petition, stating the particular ground or grounds on which the petitioner is not so authorized;

An order dismissing the petition and directing the petitioner to pay all costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 9.

416.620.
Trial
of exceptions to interlocutory judgment — Questions as to compensation
to be tried by jury — Appeals.

Within thirty (30) days from the date of entry of an interlocutory judgment authorizing the petitioner to take possession of the property, exceptions may be filed by either party or both parties by filing with the clerk of the Circuit Court and serving upon the other party or parties a statement of exceptions, which statement shall contain any exceptions the party has to the award made by the commissioners. The statement of exceptions shall be tried, but shall be limited to the questions which are raised in the original statements of the exceptions, or as amended, but the owner shall not be permitted to raise any question, nor shall the court reconsider any question so raised, concerning the right of the petitioner to condemn the property. All questions of fact pertaining to the amount of compensation to the owner, or owners, shall be determined by a jury, which jury on the motion of either party shall be sent by the court, in the charge of the sheriff, to view the land and material. After a jury trial, and if possession previously has not been taken by the condemnor of the land and material condemned, it may do so upon the payment to the owner or to the clerk of the Circuit Court the amount of the compensation adjudged by the Circuit Court to be due the owner.

Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals from the final judgment of the Circuit Court as in other cases except that an appeal by the owner shall not operate as a supersedeas.

The payment by the condemnor of the amount of compensation awarded and the taking possession of the lands and material condemned shall not prejudice its right to except from the award of the commissioners or the judgment of any court, nor shall the acceptance by the owner of the amount of the compensation awarded prejudice his right to except from the award of the commissioners or the judgment of any court.

All costs in the Circuit Court shall be adjudged against the condemnor.

If the condemnor takes possession of the property condemned and the amount of compensation is thereafter increased over that awarded by the commissioners, the condemnor shall pay interest to the owner at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum upon the amount of such increase from the date the condemnor took possession of the property. If the condemnor takes possession of the property condemned and the amount of compensation is thereafter decreased below that awarded by the commissioners, the condemnor shall be entitled to a personal judgment against the owner for the amount of the decrease plus interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the date the owner accepted the amount of compensation the condemnor paid into court or to the owner. If the owner at all times refuses to accept the payment tendered by the condemnor, no interest shall be allowed in the judgment against the owner for the amount of the decrease.

Upon the final determination of exceptions, or upon expiration of thirty (30) days from entry of the interlocutory judgment if no exceptions are filed, the Circuit Court shall make such orders as may be proper for the conveyance of the title to the extent condemned, to the property, and shall enter such final judgment as may be appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 10.

416.630.
Money
paid into court.

All money paid into court or
paid or transferred to the clerk of a court under the provisions of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

shall be received by the clerk of the court and held subject to
the order of the court, for which the clerk and his sureties on his official
bond shall be responsible to the persons entitled thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 11.

416.640.
Conflicting
claimants to condemned land.

Where there are conflicting
claimants to the land sought to be condemned and all such parties are before
the court, each claimant, for the purposes of the condemnation proceeding
only, shall be deemed to be an owner, and the procedure for the condemnation
of the land shall be as provided in KRS

416.550

to

416.670

except that, before
the condemnor shall be entitled to take possession of the land, it shall be
required to pay the compensation awarded therein to the Circuit Court clerk
to be held for the benefit of, and paid over to such persons as may thereafter
be determined to be entitled to receive it. In such cases, the claimants may
have their rights determined in a separate action, but the filing of such
action or its pendency shall in no wise stay or delay said condemnation proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 12.

416.650.
Proceedings
governed by Rules of Civil Procedure.

All proceedings under KRS

416.550

to

416.670

shall be governed by the provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure
except where the provisions of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

specifically or by necessary
implication provide otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 13.

416.660.
Standards
for determining compensation — Changes in value — Taking date.

In all actions for the condemnation of lands under the provisions of KRS

416.550

to

416.670

, except temporary easements, there shall be awarded to the landowners as compensation such a sum as will fairly represent the difference between the fair market value of the entire tract, all or a portion of which is sought to be condemned, immediately before the taking and the fair market value of the remainder thereof immediately after the taking, including in the remainder all rights which the landowner may retain in the lands sought to be condemned where less than the fee simple interest therein is taken, together with the fair rental value of any temporary easements sought to be condemned.

Any change in the fair market value prior to the date of condemnation which the condemnor or condemnee establishes was substantially due to the general knowledge of the imminence of condemnation or the construction of the project shall be disregarded in determining fair market value. The taking date for valuation purposes shall be either the date the condemnor takes the land, or the date of the trial of the issue of just compensation, whichever occurs first.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 14.

416.670.
Limitations
on condemnation powers — Rights of current landowner.

Development shall be started on any property which has been acquired through condemnation within a period of eight (8) years from the date of the deed to the condemnor or the date on which the condemnor took possession, whichever is earlier, for the purpose for which it was condemned. The failure of the condemnor to so begin development shall entitle the current landowner to repurchase the property at the price the condemnor paid to the landowner for the property. The current owner of the land from which the condemned land was taken may reacquire the land as aforementioned.

Any condemnor who fails to develop property acquired by condemnation or who fails to begin design on highway projects pursuant to KRS Chapter 177 within a period of eight (8) years after acquisition, shall notify the current landowner of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the current landowner refuses to purchase property described in this section, public notice shall be given in a manner prescribed in KRS Chapter 424 within thirty (30) days of the refusal, and the property shall be sold at auction. Provided, however, that this section shall not apply to property acquired for purposes of industrial development pursuant to KRS Chapter 152 or a project of a transportation improvement district under KRS

184.350

to 184.345.

If there are two (2) or more current owners of the land from which the condemned land was taken because the remaining land was subdivided, and if they have a common boundary with the condemned land, the condemned land shall be reacquired by allowing all owners of a parcel of the remaining land with a common boundary and from which the condemned land was taken to offer sealed bids for the condemned land within thirty (30) days of notification by the condemnor. The condemnor shall accept the highest and best sealed bid equal to or greater than the price paid at the time of condemnation. If there are no sealed bids or if all sealed bids are below the original price paid by the condemnor for the property, the property shall be sold at auction.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 15; 1978, ch. 384, § 117, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2022 ch. 180, § 20, effective July 14, 2022.

416.675.
Public use required — No condemnation for indirect benefit — Exemption.

Every grant of authority contained in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to exercise the power of eminent domain shall be subject to the condition that the authority be exercised only to effectuate a public use of the condemned property.

“Public use” shall mean the following:

Ownership of the property by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or other governmental entity;

The possession, occupation, or enjoyment of the property as a matter of right by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or other governmental entity;

The acquisition and transfer of property for the purpose of eliminating blighted areas, slum areas, or substandard and insanitary areas in accordance with KRS Chapter 99;

The use of the property for the creation or operation of public utilities or common carriers; or

Other use of the property expressly authorized by statute.

No provision in the law of the Commonwealth shall be construed to authorize the condemnation of private property for transfer to a private owner for the purpose of economic development that benefits the general public only indirectly, such as by increasing the tax base, tax revenues, or employment, or by promoting the general economic health of the community. However, this provision shall not prohibit the sale or lease of property to private entities that occupy an incidental area within a public project or building, provided that no property may be condemned primarily for the purpose of facilitating an incidental private use.

The exercise of the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of property financed by state road funds or federal highway funds shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 73, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

416.680.
Short
title.

KRS

416.540

to

416.670

shall
be known as the “Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 1.